Tennessee statutes. Title 28 Limitation Of Actions
Part 1

Miscellaneous Limitations

28-3-101. Scope of chapter.

All civil actions, other than those for causes embraced in chapter 2 of this title, shall be commenced after the cause of action has accrued, within the periods prescribed in this chapter, unless otherwise expressly provided.

Code 1858, § 2769; Shan., § 4466; Code 1932, § 8592; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-301.

Compiler's Note. For the Preamble to the act concerning domestic relations orders, see Acts 2020, ch. 596.

Cross-References. Limitation of product liability actions, § 29-28-103.

Not-for-profit board members, immunity from suit, § 48-58-601.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 669.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 98; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, §§ 9, 11, 17.

Law Reviews.

An Exegesis of the Ejectment Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 581 (1988).

Constitutional Law — Limitation of Actions — Application of the Products Liability Statute of Repose, 52 Tenn. L. Rev. 97 (1984).

28-3-102. Actions against personal representative.

All actions against the personal representative of a decedent, for demands against such decedent, shall be brought within seven (7) years after the decedent's death, notwithstanding any disability existing; otherwise they will be forever barred.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to extend the time limited by §§ 30-2-310, 30-2-314 and 30-2-315.

Code 1858, § 2786 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 48, § 9); Shan., § 4483; Code 1932, § 8610; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8610; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-302; Acts 1990, ch. 970, § 1.

Cross-References. Time between death of person and grant of letters not exceeding six months not counted, § 28-1-110.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 437.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 763.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, § 14; 5 Tenn. Juris., Children Born out of Wedlock, § 10; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, §§ 97-99; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 33; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 177.

28-3-103. Slander actions.

Actions for slanderous words spoken shall be commenced within six (6) months after the words are uttered.

Code 1858, § 2771 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 27, § 5); Shan., § 4468; Code 1932, § 8594; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-303.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Libel and Slander, § 33; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 25.

Law Reviews.

Conditional Privilege in Tennessee (Donald F. Paine), 30 Tenn. L. Rev. 569.

Torts — Quality Auto Parts Co. v. Bluff City Buick Co.: Refusing to Apply the Discovery Rule to Slander Actions (Paige A. Seals), 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 611 (1994).

28-3-104. Personal tort actions; actions against certain professionals.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2), the following actions shall be commenced within one (1) year after the cause of action accrued:

Actions for libel, injuries to the person, false imprisonment, malicious prosecution, or breach of marriage promise;

Civil actions for compensatory or punitive damages, or both, brought under the federal civil rights statutes; and

Actions for statutory penalties.

A cause of action listed in subdivision (a)(1) shall be commenced within two (2) years after the cause of action accrued, if:

Criminal charges are brought against any person alleged to have caused or contributed to the injury;

The conduct, transaction, or occurrence that gives rise to the cause of action for civil damages is the subject of a criminal prosecution commenced within one (1) year by:

A law enforcement officer;

A district attorney general; or

A grand jury; and

The cause of action is brought by the person injured by the criminal conduct against the party prosecuted for such conduct.

This subsection (a) shall be strictly construed.

For the purpose of this section, in products liability cases:

The cause of action for injury to the person shall accrue on the date of the personal injury, not the date of the negligence or the sale of a product;

No person shall be deprived of the right to maintain a cause of action until one (1) year from the date of the injury; and

Under no circumstances shall the cause of action be barred before the person sustains an injury.

Actions and suits against licensed public accountants, certified public accountants, or attorneys for malpractice shall be commenced within one (1) year after the cause of action accrued, whether the action or suit is grounded or based in contract or tort.

In no event shall any action or suit against a licensed public accountant, certified public accountant or attorney be brought more than five (5) years after the date on which the act or omission occurred, except where there is fraudulent concealment on the part of the defendant, in which case the action or suit shall be commenced within one (1) year after discovery that the cause of action exists.

Any action to recover damages against a real estate appraiser arising out of the appraiser's real estate appraisal activity shall be brought within one (1) year from a person’s discovery of the act or omission giving rise to the action, but in no event shall an action to recover damages against a real estate appraiser be brought more than five (5) years after the date the appraisal was conducted.

Code 1858, § 2772 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 27, § 5); Shan., § 4469; mod. Code 1932, § 8595; Acts 1967, ch. 283, § 1; 1969, ch. 28, § 1; 1969, ch. 293, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 669, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-304; Acts 1990, ch. 970, § 2; 1990, ch. 1056, § 2; 2014, ch. 618, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 388, § 1; 2017, ch. 234, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 618, § 3 provided that this act shall apply to causes of actions or suits for acts or omissions that occurred on or after July 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, ch. 388, § 2 provided that the act, which amended (a), shall apply to causes of action accruing on or after July 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 234, § 3 provided that the act, which added subsection (d), shall apply to actions accruing and appraisals conducted on or after July 1, 2017.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 234, § 3. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Abolition of common law tort action of alienation of affections, § 36-3-701.

Abolition of common law torts of seduction and criminal conversation, § 39-13-508.

Limitation of actions, counterclaim or third party complaint, § 28-1-114.

Limitation of actions, Uniform Contribution Among Tort-Feasors Act, § 29-11-104.

Not-for-profit board members, immunity from suit, § 48-58-601.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 637.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, § 12; 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36; 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 71; 10 Tenn. Juris., Employer and Employee, § 65; 17 Tenn. Juris., Libel and Slander, § 33; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, §§ 5, 14, 17, 25, 34; 18 Tenn. Juris., Malicious Prosecution, § 7; 22 Tenn. Juris., Seduction, § 3.

Law Reviews.

A Pragmatic Approach to Improving Tort Law, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1447 (2001).

Accidental Torts, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1225 (2001).

Accrual of Cause of Action in Products Liability and Other Tort Actions, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 593.

Age Discrimination: A Growth Industry (Charles H. Anderson), 25 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 24 (1989).

As a Matter of Law: Summary Judgment in Medical Malpractice Litigation in Tennessee, 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 55 (1984).

Attorney and Client — Negligence — Limitation of Action, 34 Tenn. L. Rev. 507.

Attorney Malpractice — The Accrual of a Cause of Action, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 784.

Civil Procedure and Evidence — Tennessee Survey 1970 (Jerry J. Phillips), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 127.

Civil Procedure — Carr v. Borchers: Tennessee's Nonresident Motorist Statute Revisited, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 357 (1992).

Civil Rights — Statutes of Limitations for Section 1983 Actions — A Definitive Answer in Wilson v. Garcia?, 17 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 127 (1986).

Conditional Privilege in Tennessee (Donald F. Paine), 30 Tenn. L. Rev. 569.

Conflict of Laws — Limitation of Actions — Lex Loci or Lex Fori, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1038.

Conflict of Laws — 1957 Tennessee Survey (John W. Wade), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 995.

Constitutional Challenge to Medical Malpractice Review Boards, 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 607.

Constitutional Law — Limitation of Actions — Application of the Vested Rights Doctrine (David A. King), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 129 (1983).

Constitutional Law — Retroactive Application of a Statute Removing a Statute of Limitations Bar, 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 914.

Contract — Tort — Breach of Duty Resulting in Property Damage — Limitation of Action, 34 Tenn. L. Rev. 297.

Contracts and Sales Law in Tennessee: A Survey and Commentary: III Sales (John A. Sebert, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 391.

Cost-Benefit Analysis and the Negligence Standard, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 893 (2001).

Counterclaims and Statutes of Limitations — A Critical Commentary on Present Tennessee Law (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 291.

Domestic Relations — Alienation of Affections — Statute of Limitations, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1046.

Domestic Relations — 1955 Tennessee Survey (William J. Harbison), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 1004.

Duty Rules, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 767 (2001).

Economic Loss in Strict Liability — Beyond the Realm of 402 A (Joe E. Manuel and Gregory B. Richards), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 315 (1986).

Employment Law — Carr v. United Parcel Service: Individual Liability Under the Tennessee Human Rights Act, 29 U. Mem. L. Rev. 245 (1998).

Has the Pendulum Swung Too Far? The Status of the Discovery Rule in Medical Malpractice Cases in Tennessee, 30 U. Mem. L. Rev. 625 (2000).

Intent and Recklessness in Tort: The Practical Craft of Restating Law, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1133 (2001).

Interpretive Construction, Systematic Consistency, and Criterial Norms in Tort Law, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1157 (2001).

Legal Cause: Cause-In-Fact and the Scope of Liability for Consequences, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 941 (2001).

Legal Malpractice: The Profession's Dirty Little Secret (Manuel R. Ramos), 47 Vand. L. Rev. 1657 (1994).

Legal Profession — Attorney and Client, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 611.

Limitation of Actions — Accrual of Action in Malpractice Cases, 13 Tenn. L. Rev. 131.

Limitation of Actions — Statutory Construction — “Act or Omission Complained Of,” 6 Vand. L. Rev. 794.

Malpractice in Dealing with Medical Malpractice, 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 437.

Mass Tort Litigation in Tennessee (Paul Campbell, III and Hugh J. Moore, Jr.), 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 221 (1986).

Medical Malpractice (Ray L. Jenkins), 26 Tenn. L. Rev. 514.

Non-Utilitarian Negligence Norms and the Reasonable Person Standard, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 863 (2001).

On Determining Negligence Norms, the Reasonable Person Standard, and the Jury, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 813 (2001).

Once More Into the Bramble Bush: Duty, Causal Contribution, and the Extent of Legal Responsibility, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1071 (2001).

Pleadings, Motions and Pre-Trial Procedure, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

Please Pass the Biscuits and Gravamen (Donald F. Paine), 29 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1993).

Procedure — Limitation of Actions — Tolling of Statute by Fraudulent Concealment, 25 Tenn. L. Rev. 284.

Procedure — 1963 Tennessee Survey (William J. Harbison), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 1108.

Products Liability of Retailers and Manufacturers in Tennessee (Dix W. Noel), 32 Tenn. L. Rev. 207.

Products Liability — Lessors as Warrantors of Fitness in Tennessee, 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 303 (1986).

Protecting Yourself from Statutes of Repose, 50 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2014).

Purpose, Belief, and Recklessness: Pruning the Restatement's (Third) Definition of Intent, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1165 (2001).

Recent Developments in Tennessee and Federal Procedure (Donald F. Paine), 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 276.

Recent Developments in the Law of Accrual and Limitations of Actions in Tennessee as Applied to Products Liability Cases (Michael E. Hewgley), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 105.

Removing Emotional Harm from the Core of Tort Law, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 751 (2001).

Restatement (Third) of Torts: General Principles and the Prescription of Masculine Order, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1367 (2001).

Restating Duty, Breach, and Proximate Cause in Negligence Law: Descriptive Theory and the Rule of Law, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1039 (2001).

Savings Statutes v. Statutes of Repose: A Decision Is Reached with Cronin v. Howe (Philip E. Mischke), 32 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 21 (1996).

Scientific Uncertainty and Causation in Tort Law, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1011 (2001).

Statute of Limitations — Personal Injury, Property Damage and Breach of Warranty, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 803.

Statute of Limitations — Professional Negligence — Foreign Objects Left in Patient's Body, 17 Vand. L. Rev. 1577.

Statute of Limitations: Their Selection and Application in Products Liability Cases (Larry T. Thrailkill), 23 Vand. L. Rev. 775.

Stealing Love in Tennessee: The Thief Goes Free, 56 Tenn. L. Rev. 629 (1989).

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, IV. Pretrial Procedure (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 308.

Tennessee Human Rights Act: Court of Appeals addresses limitations period of THRA (Timothy S. Bland and Licia M. Williams), 38 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (2002).

Tennessee Legislature Abolishes Privity Requirement and Clarifies Statute of Limitations in Product Liability Cases, 3 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 212.

Tennessee Survey of the Law — Indemnity in Tort, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 307.

The Advent of Implied Warranty of Workmanlike Construction, 12 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 367 (1982).

The Duty Concept in Negligence Law, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 787 (2001).

The Hand Formula in the Draft Restatement (Third) of Torts: Encompassing Fairness as Well as Efficiency Values, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 901 (2001).

The John W. Wade Conference on the Third Restatement of Torts, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 639 (2001).

The Nonparty Tortfeasor (June F. Entman), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (1992).

The Passing of Palsgraf?, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 803 (2001).

The Restatement of Torts and the Courts, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1439 (2001).

The Restatement (Third) and the Place of Duty in Negligence Law, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 657 (2001).

The Tennessee Employer's Wrongful Discharge and the Union's Breach of the Duty of Fair Representation — Does Tennessee Need a Statute of Limitations? (Marsha H. Ashlock), 20 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 15 (1984).

The Tennessee Products Liability Act of 1978. (Irvin L. Tankersley), 14-4 Tenn. B.J. 11.

The Tennessee Saving Statute, 29 Tenn. L. Rev. 287.

The Theory of Enterprise Liability and Common Law Strict Liability, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1285 (2001).

The Theory of Tort Doctrine and the Restatement (Third) of Torts, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1413 (2001).

The Trouble with Negligence, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1187 (2001).

The Unexpected Persistence of Negligence, 1980 — 2000, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1337 (2001).

Torts — Attorney's Liability — No Liability to Disappointed Beneficiaries for Negligent Handling of Will, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 188.

Torts — Libel — Single Publication Rule Adopted — Statute of Limitations Starts Running When Libel Is First Distributed in County in Which Suit Is Brought, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 193.

Torts — Limitations of Actions — Application of the Four Year Statute in Breach of Warranty Actions, 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 293.

Torts — Medical Malpractice — Statute of Limitations and the Discovery Rule in Tennessee, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 604.

Torts — 1956 Tennessee Survey (John W. Wade), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 1137.

Torts — Products Liability — Statute of Limitations, 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 416.

Torts — Statute of Limitations — Actions for Personal Injury Resulting from Faulty Construction of Building Does Not Accrue until Date of Injury, 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Torts — Statute of Limitations — Employee Injured Using Employer's Equipment, 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 608.

Torts — Statute of Limitations — Personal Injury — Defect in Real Estate Construction, 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 613.

Torts — Taylor v. Beard: The Tennessee Supreme Court Declines Adoption of a Cause of Action for Loss of Parental Consortium in Personal Injury Cases, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 737 (2004).

Torts — The Discovery Rule and the Statute of Limitations in Medical Malpractice Actions, 14 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 115 (1983).

Uninsured Motorist Coverage in Tennessee (Phillip A. Fleissner), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 391.

Uninsured Motorist Insurance: Selected Tennessee Procedural Aspects, 10 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 746.

Wrongful Death Actions in Tennessee (T.A. Smedley), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 447.

Wrongful Death in Tennessee — New Solutions to Recurring Problems, 9 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 85.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability, OAG 84-121, 1982 Tenn. AG LEXIS 220 (4/10/84).

28-3-105. Property tort actions — Statutory liabilities.

The following actions shall be commenced within three (3) years from the accruing of the cause of action:

Actions for injuries to personal or real property;

Actions for the detention or conversion of personal property; and

Civil actions based upon the alleged violation of any federal or state statute creating monetary liability for personal services rendered, or liquidated damages or other recovery therefor, when no other time of limitation is fixed by the statute creating such liability.

Code 1858, § 2773 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 27, § 5); Shan., § 4470; Code 1932, § 8598; Acts 1945, ch. 130, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8598; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-305; Acts 1989, ch. 517, § 2.

Cross-References. Common law tort action of alienation of affections abolished, § 36-3-701.

Presumption of ownership from possession of personal property, § 66-3-103.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 177.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 637.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Accounts and Accounting, § 15; 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36; 4 Tenn. Juris., Bailments, § 17; 10 Tenn. Juris., Election of Remedies, § 2; 13 Tenn. Juris., Fraudulent and Voluntary Conveyances, § 47; 17 Tenn. Juris., Labor, § 16; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, §§ 12, 15-17, 20, 27, 34, 42; 20 Tenn. Juris., Nuisances, § 33; 24 Tenn. Juris., Trademarks, Trade Names and Unfair Competition, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Accrual of Cause of Action in Products Liability and Other Tort Actions, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 593.

Attorney and Client — Negligence — Limitation of Action, 4 Tenn. L. Rev. 507.

Civil Procedure — Pero's Steak & Spaghetti House v. Lee: Tennessee Declines to Extend the Discovery Rule to Claims of Converted Negotiable Instruments, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 475 (2004).

Contract — Tort — Breach of Duty Resulting in Property Damage — Limitation of Action, 34 Tenn. L. Rev. 297.

Contracts and Sales Law in Tennessee: A Survey and Commentary: III. Sales (John A. Sebert, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 391.

Counterclaims and Statutes of Limitations — A Critical Commentary on Present Tennessee Law (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 291.

Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, II. Alienation of Affections (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 429.

Domestic Relations — Alienation of Affections — Statute of Limitations, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1046.

Domestic Relations — 1955 Tennessee Survey (William J. Harbison), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 1004.

Labor Law — 1963 Tennessee Survey (Paul H. Sanders & Harvey Couch), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 1091.

Nuisances — Permanent Injury — Limitations of Actions, 28 Tenn. L. Rev. 433.

Paine on Procedure: The Statute of Limitations for Conversion of Personal Property (Donald F. Paine), 45 Tenn. B.J. 29 (2009).

Please Pass the Biscuits and Gravamen (Donald F. Paine), 29 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1993).

Products Liability of Retailers and Manufacturers in Tennessee (Dix W. Noel), 32 Tenn. L. Rev. 207.

Recent Developments in the Law of Accrual and Limitation of Actions in Tennessee as Applied to Products Liability Cases (Michael E. Hewgley), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 105.

Sales — Breach of Warranty — Statute of Limitations, 33 Tenn. L. Rev. 250.

Statutes of Limitations — Personal Injury, Property Damage and Breach of Warranty, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 803.

Statute of Limitations — Tolling of Statute by Suit in Court without Jurisdiction, 9 Tenn. L. Rev. 200.

Tennessee Legislature Abolishes Privity Requirement and Clarifies Statute of Limitations in Product Liability Cases, 3 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 212.

The Advent of Implied Warranty of Workmanlike Construction, 12 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 367 (1982).

The Tennessee Employer's Wrongful Discharge and the Union's Breach of the Duty of Fair Representation — Does Tennessee Need a Statute of Limitations? (Marsha H. Ashlock), 20 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 15 (1984).

The Tennessee Products Liability Act of 1978 (Irvin L. Tankersley), 14-4 Tenn. B.J. 11.

The Weakest Link: Application of the Property Damage Statute of Limitation to Tort Claims for Purely Economic Damages, 32 U. Mem. L. Rev. 45 (2001).

Torts — Limitations of Actions — Application of the Four Year Statute in Breach of Warranty Actions, 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 293.

Torts — 1956 Tennessee Survey (John W. Wade), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 1137.

Torts — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Dix W. Noel), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1409.

Torts — Statute of Limitations — Personal Injury — Defect in Real Estate Construction, 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 613.

28-3-106. Recovery of gambling losses.

Actions to recover money or goods lost at any kind of gambling or betting, and paid or delivered:

If brought by the loser, shall be commenced within ninety (90) days next after such payment or delivery;

If brought for the use of the spouse, child or children, or next of kin, within twelve (12) months from the expiration of the ninety (90) days;

If by a creditor of the loser, within twenty-four (24) months from the end of the ninety (90) days.

Code 1858, § 2770 (deriv. Acts 1799, ch. 8, § 4); Shan., § 4467; Code 1932, § 8593; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-306.

Cross-References. Gambling contracts, title 29, ch. 19.

28-3-107. Actions for usury.

No action shall be brought on claim for usury after two (2) years from the date of the payment of the debt upon which such claim for usury shall be based.

Acts 1903, ch. 439, § 1; Shan., § 4469a2; Code 1932, § 8597; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-307.

Cross-References. Usury, statute of limitations, § 47-14-118.

28-3-108. Actions against sureties of collecting officer.

Actions against sureties of any collecting officer, for failing to pay over money collected, when the collecting officer has made return of an execution or other process that the money is made or the process satisfied, shall be commenced within three (3) years from the return of the process.

Code 1858, § 2774 (deriv. Acts 1823, ch. 16, § 1); Shan., § 4471; Code 1932, § 8599; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-308.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 29.

28-3-109. Rent — Official misconduct — Contracts not otherwise covered — Title insurance — Demand notes.

The following actions shall be commenced within six (6) years after the cause of action accrued:

Actions for the use and occupation of land and for rent;

Actions against the sureties of guardians, executors and administrators, sheriffs, clerks, and other public officers, for nonfeasance, misfeasance, and malfeasance in office; and

Actions on contracts not otherwise expressly provided for.

The cause of action on title insurance policies, guaranteeing title to real estate, shall accrue on the date the loss or damage insured or guaranteed against is sustained.

The cause of action on demand notes shall be commenced within ten (10) years after the cause of action accrued.

Code 1858, § 2775 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 27, § 5); Shan., § 4472; Code 1932, § 8600; Acts 1947, ch. 126, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8600; Acts 1976, ch. 472, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-309.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 637, 763, 835.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Accounts and Accounting, § 15; 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, § 12; 5 Tenn. Juris., Bonds, § 11; 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 49; 8 Tenn. Juris., Covenants, § 21; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, §§ 98, 101; 14 Tenn. Juris., Guardian and Ward, § 32; 15 Tenn. Juris., Insurance, § 83; 17 Tenn. Juris., Labor, § 13; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, §§ 10-13, 17, 26, 27, 34, 46; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 8; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 75.

Law Reviews.

Attorney and Client — Negligence — Limitation of Action, 34 Tenn. L. Rev. 507.

Contract — Tort — Breach of Duty Resulting in Property Damage — Limitation of Action, 34 Tenn. L. Rev. 297.

Contracts and Sales Law in Tennessee: A Survey and Commentary, II. Contracts (John A. Sebert, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 353.

Guarantor Liability in Tennessee: Past, Present & Future, 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 601 (1985).

Insurance — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Robert N. Covington), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1303.

Legal Profession — Attorney and Client, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 611.

Please Pass the Biscuits and Gravamen (Donald F. Paine), 29 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1993).

Products Liability — Accrual and Limitations of Actions, 35 Tenn. L. Rev. 335.

Recent Developments in the Law of Accrual and Limitation of Actions in Tennessee as Applied to Products Liability Cases (Michael E. Hewgley), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 105.

Sales — Breach of Warranty — Statute of Limitations, 33 Tenn. L. Rev. 250.

Tennessee Survey of the Law — Indemnity in Tort, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 307.

The Law of Negotiable Instruments, Bank Deposits, and Collections in Tennessee: A Survey of Changes in the 1990 Revision to UCC Articles 3 and 4 (Virigina Wilson), 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 117 (1997).

The Tennessee Employer's Wrongful Discharge and the Union's Breach of the Duty of Fair Representation — Does Tennessee Need a Statute of Limitations? (Marsha H. Ashlock), 20 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 15 (1984).

Torts — Attorney's Liability — No Liability to Disappointed Beneficiaries for Negligent Handling of Will, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 188.

Torts — Limitations of Actions — Application of the Four Year Statute in Breach of Warranty Actions, 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 293.

Uninsured Motorist Coverage in Tennessee (Phillip A. Fleissner), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 391.

Wrongful Death Actions in Tennessee (T. A. Smedley), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 447.

28-3-110. Actions on public officers' and fiduciary bonds — Actions not otherwise covered
— Affidavit of conviction and civil judgment.

The following actions shall be commenced within ten (10) years after the cause of action accrued:

Actions against guardians, executors, administrators, sheriffs, clerks, and other public officers on their bonds;

Actions on judgments and decrees of courts of record of this or any other state or government; and

All other cases not expressly provided for.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), there is no time within which a judgment or decree of a court of record entered on or after July 1, 2014, must be acted upon in the following circumstances:

The judgment is for the injury or death of a person that resulted from the judgment debtor's criminal conduct; and

The judgment debtor is convicted of a criminal offense for the conduct that resulted in the injury or death; or

The civil judgment is originally an order of restitution converted to a civil judgment pursuant to § 40-35-304.

Prior to entry of the judgment, the judge shall make a determination on the record that the plaintiff's injury or death was the result of the defendant's criminal conduct and that the defendant's conduct resulted in a criminal conviction.

When entering a civil judgment on or after July 1, 2014, to which this subsection (b) applies, both the trial judge and clerk shall sign and note the existence of the conviction on the judgment document, and the clerk shall also make appropriate docket notations. Such signatures and notations shall be sufficient evidence that the judgment is valid until paid in full or otherwise discharged as authorized by law.

Notwithstanding subsection (b), if a person was awarded a judgment meeting the criteria of subdivision (b)(1) but the judgment was entered prior to July 1, 2014, and is still valid as of the date it is presented to the clerk pursuant to this subsection (c), the statute of limitations on such judgment set out in subsection (a) shall be tolled if the person:

Obtains a certified copy of the defendant's judgment of conviction from the clerk of the court in which the conviction occurred showing that the conviction meets the criteria of subdivision (b)(1)(A) and (B);

Obtains a certified copy of the person's civil judgment that was based on the defendant's criminal conduct;

Completes, under penalty of perjury, an affidavit, in substantially the form set out in subsection (d).

The clerk shall ensure that the documents presented are those required by subdivision (c)(1). If they are the correct documents, the clerk shall record the documents and from the date of recordation, the statute of limitations of the person's civil judgment shall be tolled.

The affidavit required to accompany the judgment of conviction and civil judgment shall be substantially as follows:

AFFIDAVIT Comes the Affiant (Printed Name) Under penalties of perjury, affiant deposes and says, to wit as follows: 1. I was awarded the attached civil judgment based upon the criminal conduct of another. 2. The attached judgment of conviction was the result of the criminal conduct. 3. The civil judgment and the judgment of conviction were based upon the same conduct. 4. The provision of § 28-3-110(b) is applicable to affiant pursuant to § 28-3-110(c). Further Affiant Saith Not Signature of Affiant ACKNOWLEDGEMENT State of Tennessee County of On this day of , 20 , before me personally appeared to me known to be the person described in and who executed the foregoing instrument, and acknowledged that he/she executed the same as his/her free act and deed, for the purposes therein set forth. (County Clerk) (Notary Public) My Commission Expires 20

Click to view form.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), there is no time within which a judgment or decree in a domestic relations matter issued by a court with domestic relations jurisdiction pursuant to title 36 must be acted upon, unless otherwise specifically provided for under title 36.

Code 1858, § 2776; Shan., § 4473; Code 1932, § 8601; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-310; Acts 2014, ch. 596, § 1; 2020, ch. 596, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 596, § 3 provided that the act, which added subsections (b)-(d), shall apply to all applicable civil judgments entered after July 1, 2014 and to such judgments entered before July 1, 2014, if the judgment is still valid and the person follows the procedure in § 28-3-110(c) and (d).

For the Preamble to the act concerning domestic relations orders, see Acts 2020, ch. 596.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 596, § 2. March 20, 2020.

Cross-References. Abolition of common law tort action of alienation of affections, § 36-3-701.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 234.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 669, 763, 835.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, §§ 98, 101; 14 Tenn. Juris., Guardian and Ward, § 32; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, §§ 68, 70, 73; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 30; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, §§ 9, 10, 17, 34; 22 Tenn. Juris., Rescission, Cancellation and Reformation, § 57; 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 29.

Law Reviews.

Contracts — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Paul J. Hartman), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1035.

Domestic Relations — Alienation of Affections — Statute of Limitations, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1046.

Judgments — Statute of Limitations, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 300.

Nuisances — Permanent Injury — Limitations of Actions, 28 Tenn. L. Rev. 433.

Recent Developments in the Law of Accrual and Limitation of Actions in Tennessee as Applied to Products Liability Cases (Michael E. Hewgley), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 105.

Tennessee Survey of the Law — Indemnity in Tort, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 307.

Tennessee's Prohibition of the Retroactive Modification of Child Support Orders, 59 Tenn. L. Rev. 425 (1992).

The Many Lives of a Tennessee Judgment Lien (Stephen M. Sumner), 20 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 31 (1984).

Torts — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Dix W. Noel), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1409.

28-3-111. Open accounts of merchants.

The limitations provided in this chapter do not apply to such actions as concern the trade of merchandise between merchant and merchant, their agents and factors, while the accounts between them are current.

Code 1858, § 2777 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 27, § 5); Shan., § 4474; Code 1932, § 8602; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-311.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 11.

28-3-112. Mutual accounts between persons not merchants.

When there are mutual accounts between persons who are not merchants, the time is computed from the true date of the last item, unless the account is liquidated and a balance struck.

Code 1858, § 2778; Shan., § 4475; Code 1932, § 8603; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-312.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Accounts and Accounting, § 14.

28-3-113. Municipal bonds.

Actions against any county, city, town, utility district, special school district or any other municipality or political subdivision of the state for the payment of any bond issued thereby, or for the payment of any coupon representing interest on such bond, shall be commenced within fifteen (15) years after the maturity date of such bond unless such county, municipality, district or political subdivision by action of its governing body shall waive such limitation.

Acts 1957, ch. 115, § 1; T.C.A., § 28-313.

28-3-114. Actions for faulty surveying.

All actions to recover damages against any person engaged in the practice of surveying for any deficiency, defect, omission, error or miscalculation shall be brought within four (4) years from the date the survey is recorded on the plat. Any such action not instituted within this four (4) year period shall be forever barred. The cause of action in such cases shall accrue when the services are performed.

“Practice of land surveying” as used in this section includes, but is limited to, those activities set forth in § 62-18-102(3), and the establishment or reestablishment of corners, boundaries, and locations of lots, parcels, tracts, or divisions of land, including distances, directions, and acreage, or fractional parts thereof; and also including, but not limited to, the correct determination and description of the same for the purpose of furnishing a legal description of any land surveyed to be used in deeds or other instruments of conveyances for the purpose of conveying title to the area surveyed.

Acts 1980, ch. 811, § 2; T.C.A., § 28-319.

Cross-References. County surveyors, title 8, ch. 12.

Land surveyors, §§ 62-18-101 — 62-18-116.

Liability for wrongful survey, § 8-12-115.

28-3-115. Attaching or executing against art work.

No process of attachment, execution, sequestration, replevin, distress, subpoena or any kind of seizure, whether civil or criminal, shall be served or levied upon any work of art, as defined in this section while the same is en route to or from, or while on exhibition or deposited by an exhibitor at any exhibition held under the auspices or supervision of any museum, visual arts center, college, university or other nonprofit art gallery, institution or organization within any city or county of this state for any cultural, educational, charitable or other purpose not conducted for profit to the exhibitor, nor shall such work of art be subject to attachment, seizure, levy or sale, for any cause whatever while in the hands of the authorities of such exhibition or otherwise. Nothing in the act shall prevent a lawsuit being brought against an owner of a work of art in any court having proper jurisdiction over such owner.

Acts 2000, ch. 728, § 1.

28-3-116. Action for injury or illness based on child sexual abuse.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Child sexual abuse” means any act set out in § 37-1-602(a)(3), that occurred when the victim was a minor;

“Discovery” means when the injured person becomes aware that the injury or illness was caused by child sexual abuse. Discovery that the injury or illness was caused by child sexual abuse shall not be deemed to have occurred solely by virtue of the injured person's awareness, knowledge, or memory of the acts of abuse;

“Injury or illness” means either a physical injury or illness or a psychological injury or illness; and

“Minor” means a person under eighteen (18) years of age.

Notwithstanding § 28-3-104, a civil action for an injury or illness based on child sexual abuse that occurred when the injured person was a minor must be brought:

For child sexual abuse that occurred before July 1, 2019, but was not discovered at the time of the abuse, within three (3) years from the time of discovery of the abuse by the injured person; or

For child sexual abuse that occurred on or after July 1, 2019, within the later of:

Fifteen (15) years from the date the person becomes eighteen (18) years of age; or

If the injury or illness was not discovered at the time of the abuse, within three (3) years from the time of discovery of the abuse by the injured person.

A person bringing an action under this section need not establish or prove:

Which act in a series of continuing child sexual abuse incidents by the alleged perpetrator caused the injury or illness complained of, but may compute the date of discovery from the date of discovery of the last act by the same alleged perpetrator which is part of a common scheme or pattern of child sexual abuse; or

That the injured person psychologically repressed the memory of the facts upon which the claim is predicated.

In an action brought under this section, the knowledge of a parent or guardian shall not be imputed to a minor.

If an action is brought against someone other than the alleged perpetrator of the child sexual abuse, and if the action is brought more than one (1) year from the date the injured person attains the age of majority, the injured person must offer admissible and credible evidence corroborating the claim of abuse by the alleged perpetrator.

Acts 2016, ch. 737, § 1; 2019, ch. 499, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 737, § 2 provided that the act, which added this code section, shall take effect April 7, 2016, and shall apply to all actions pending on such date as well as all actions commenced on or after such date.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (b) which read, “(b) Notwithstanding § 28-3-104, a civil action for an injury or illness based on child sexual abuse that occurred when the injured person was a minor, but was not discovered at the time of the abuse, shall be brought within three (3) years from the time of discovery of the abuse by the injured person.” and rewrote (e) which read, “(e) Notwithstanding subsection (b), in no event shall an action under this section be brought against the alleged perpetrator of the child sexual abuse or against the estate of such alleged perpetrator after the perpetrator's death later than seven (7) years from the date the child becomes eighteen (18) years of age. If the action is brought more than one (1) year from the date the injured person attains the age of majority, the injured person must offer admissible and credible evidence corroborating the claim of abuse by the alleged perpetrator.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 499, § 10. July 1, 2019.